Massachusetts, session 194th, S2478.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 59 of chapter 33 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking subsection (e) and inserting in place thereof the following
subsection:-
(e) An employee of a county, city or town which shall be entitled to the benefits and
protections of this section or the benefits of the accepted earlier law.
of 1